Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-411
Interns; grants; rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to govern the award and disbursement of grants pursuant to sections 81-409 to 81-411.

Laws 2011, LB386, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB476, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-1210.03;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 27.
July 18, 2026